Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF423.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2055YH (2) 91 lh/ko H.F. 423 Section 1. Section 144.29A, subsection 1, paragraph k, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 k. The method used for an induced termination , including 3 whether mifepristone was used . 4 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 146F.1 Abortifacient drugs ââ 5 prohibited in the state. 6 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 7 contrary, it is unlawful for any person to manufacture, 8 distribute, prescribe, dispense, sell, or transfer 9 mifepristone, mifegyne, or mifeprex, or any substantially 10 similar generic or nongeneric abortifacient drug in the state. 11 2. A person who violates this section is guilty of a class 12 âCâ felony. 13 3. This section shall not be construed to impose civil 14 or criminal liability on a woman upon whom an abortion is 15 performed or attempted in which an abortifacient drug otherwise 16 prohibited under this section is used. 17 4. This section shall not be construed to prohibit the sale, 18 use, prescription, or administration of any contraceptive agent 19 administered prior to conception or before a pregnancy can be 20 confirmed through conventional medical testing. 21